ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/ru_RU/hyph_ru_RU.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.а1с2т
.р2
.ра2с
.ра2з1а
.раз1у
.рож1д
.ов1р
.о2г2н2
.о1г
.от1р
.о2ту
.от1в2
.о2те
.от1ел
.о2деж
.о1де
.осаж1
.о1са
.ос3м
.ос1ве
.ос1вя
.ос1л
.о1с2т
.о4стано1ви
.о1ста
.оста1но
.о1ск
.о1сп
.ох1р
.ох1в
.об1р
.об3л
.оз1н
.оз1в2
.на1в2
.ново3й1
.1но
.но1во
.ну3жда1е
.ну3ж4дают
.ну4ж3да1ю
.не1м2н
.1не
.не1в2
.ни1ч
.1ни
.м2
.м3ного.
.м1но
.мно1г
.ус1л
.у1ск
.в2
.во3дно1е
.во2д2н
.вод1но
.во2с
.вос3т
.во1й1
.ев1р
.е2жей1
.е1же
.л2
.ла1с
.ли1с
.1ли
.ль2
.1г2
.т2
.та1т
.д2
.дав3л
.до3с
.1до
.дис3
.1ди
.с2
.со3р
.1со
.сооб1
.со1о
.со1ж2
.со1зн
.со3здание.
.создани4е
.созда1ни
.смо3тре
.с2м
.с1мо
.су3ж2
.1су
.с4ле
.к2
.и2с3т
.ис1к
.и2з1а
.и2зой1
.и1зо
.из1н
.и2з1в2
.ю1р
.ч2
.п2
.по1мр
.по1с2
.перево2з3
.пе1ре
.пере1во
.й2
.б2
.бе2сп
.1бе
.ж2
.з2
.зав3тра.
.1за
.зав2
.зав1т
.зав2тр
.за1й1
а1а
а1ра
ара2з1
а1ро
а1ру
ар1в
а1ре
а1ря
а1ри
а1рю
а1ры
а1о
а1на
ан1р
ано3в2ля
а1но
анов1л
а1ну
а3мо1с
а1мо
ам3не
а1ме
а1мя
а1у
а1ва
ав3р
а1во
ав1н
а1ву
а1ве
ав1л
а1вя
ав1т
ав1д
ав1с2
а2в1к
а1ви
ав3з2
а1е
аез1
а1ла
а1ло
а1лу
а1ле
а1ля
а1лю
а1лы
а1я
аявлени4я
аяв1л
аявле1ни
аяв4ля1ю
аяв1ля
ая3вля4ю.
а3яс
а2г2н2
а1г
аг3ни
а2г1в
а1та
а1тр
а1то
атол2
атол1к3
а1ту
ат1ву
атв2
ат1ви
а1тя
атко2е
ат1к2
а1т2кос
а1ти
а1тю
ать1ев
а1тья.
а1тью
а1ты
а1да
а1др
а4д3ней1
а2д1н
ад1не
а3ду
ад1в
адер3жа
а1де
аса1ж2
а1са
ас1н
а1с2м
ас1мо1
а1св
а1се
ас1ло
ас1лев
а2с4т.
ас2т
ас3та1е
а1стр
ас3тор
ас1том
а2с4т1н
а3с4ту
ас3тет
а1с1те
ас1ка1ю
ас1кол
ас1к2л
ас1кин
ас3ч
ас4чи
ас1п
ас1х
а1ка
а1ко
а1ку
ак1в
а1к2л
а2к1ли
а2к1с
а1ки
а1и.
а1ин
аи1в2
а1и1г
а1и1д
а1ик
а1ич
аи1з
а1ю
аф1ри
а1п
а1хв
а1хе
а1йч
ай1
а1б
а1жо
аж3да.
а1жда1е
а1ждал
а1жда2я
а1ждат
аж1дай1
аж3де.
аж1де
аж3де2н.
аш4ли
а2ш1к
аза1в1т
а1за
азав2
аз1р
азо1р
а1зо
азовани4е.
азо1ва
азова1ни
азовани1е
аз1уб
аз1во
азв2
аз1ве
аз1л
аз1да
аз1др
а1ё
аэ1
2р.
раво1й1
ра1во
рать3ям
рать3ях
рас1та
рас2т
рас3то
ра1с3тв2
ра2с3те
ра2с3тит
ра1сти
ра1и
ра3жда1ю
1ра2з.
ра2з3в2
р1р
ро1рв
рооб1
ро1о
ро2гну
ро1г
рог2н2
ро1тв2
ро1др
ро1дв
ро1с2н
ро1с2м
ро1св
ро1сле
ро1сто
рос2т
ро1ск
ро1сп
ро1сх
ро3ф
ро4ф.
ро1бр
ро1бу
робуж3де
ро1буж2
ро1б2л
рож4ден
рож1де
ро3ждени4и
рожде1ни
ро2ш4ли
ро1ш
ро1зр
ро1зв2
р1н2
рно2ю
р1но
р1м
р2мь
рус3л
ру1жь
рванна2
рван1н
р1во
р1ву1ю
р1веж
р1вя
р1ви
1рвё
1ре1а
ре1р
реоб1
ре1о
рева2я.
ре1ва
ре3ва1я
ре1вр
ре1т2в2
ре2др
ре1с2м
ре1с2т
ре1сп
ре1к2л
рек1т2
ре3п2л
ре1п
1репла
1реп1ли
ре3ж4ден1н
реж1де
реж4дени4е
режде1ни
ре1зр
р1л
р2ль
р2гл
р1г
рг1ла
р3гло
р1та
р1тр
р1то
р3т2но.
р2т1н
рт1но
р3т2не
р1ту
рт1в2
ртву2я
р1т1с2
р1ти
р3ти.
р3тим
р1тью
р1ты
р1да
рди1с
р1ди
р2д2ж
р3д1жа
2р1с
р2с1н
рс2т2
р3с2т1н
р3ст1к2
р2сть
р1к
рк2н
р2к1в
р2к3л
рк2т
ри1вл
ри1с2
ри1к2л
ри1з1р
ри1зн
р1ч
1рье
4рьезнос
рье2з1но
1рья
1рьи
1рью
1рьё
р1ф
р2ф1л
р1п
р1хе
р1б
ржени4е.
р1же
рже1ни
ржени1е
рж3да2л.
р3жда1ли
рж1да3я
р1ждат
р3жда1ю
р4ждаю1щ
рж3дающи4
рж4де1на
рж1де
рж4дени4я
ржде1ни
р3ждениям
р1ш
о1а
о1ра
ораз1у
ораз1я
ора4зит
ора1зи
ораз3и1те
о1ро
орож1д
о1ру
о1ре
о1ря
ор3гл
ор1г
о4р2т.
ор1т2в2
о1ри
о1рю
о1ры
о1о
оо2т1
оо3с
оо1су1
оох1
оо3б4разил
ообра1зи
оо3бе
оо1б2л
о1на
о1нр
о1ну
о1ме
о1мя
о1у
о1ва
о1во
ово1о1
овооб2
ово3д2н
ов1н
о1вм
о1ву
о1вв
о1ве
оверг3ну1то
овер1г
оверг2н2
ов1л
о1вя
о1вт
о2в1к
о1ви
ови4и
о1вё
о1е
ое1о1
о1ла
о1ло
о1лу
о1ле
о1ля
о1лю
о1лы
о1я
оявле1ни4
ояв1л
оявля2я
ояв1ля
оясня2я
ояс1н
ояс1ня
ог3нул
о1г
ог2н2
ог3не
ог3ни
о1та
о1тре.
о3трени1е
отре1ни
о1трев
о1трел
от1ры
о1то
ото1с
о1ту
от1ум
от1ве
отв2
от1е1ле
о1те
о2т1еч
о1тя
о2т1к2
о1ти
о1тью
о1ты
о1да
ода1в2л
од1ра
од1ре
од1ры
одот1
о1до
одо2с1л
одо1с
одо1ж
одо2ш4ли
одо1ш
од3ну
о2д1н
о3д2нев
од1не
о3ду
оду3ш2ка
оду2ш1к
од2лил
од1ли
о3дли2л.
о3д1ли1ли
од2лит
од3лит1с2
осоз1
о1со
ос2ни
осмо3тре
ос2м
ос1мо
ос3мы
о2су3ж2
о1су
о3су4ж3де2н.
осуж1де
ос1во1е
ос1во1и
ос1вед
ос1вяз
о3се
ос1лы
о1ста
ос2т
останов4л
оста1но
остановле1ни4
остав4ле1но
остав1л
о1стр
ос3т3ном
о2с2т1н
ост1но
о1сту
2оси1фа
о1си
о1с2ч
ос1пр
ос1хв
о2с3б
о1ка
о2кре1п
о1кр
о1ко
о1ку
о1кв
о1к2л
окто2
ок1т
октор1
о1ки
о1и
ои2с3т
оис1к
оис3ке
ои1с2п
о4из1р
о1ю
оч1л
о1чт
о2ч1ти
о1чё
о1ф
о2ф1р
о1п
опом1
о3пе
оперево3зо
опе1ре
опере1во
оперево2з
о2п1т
о1х1не
ох1н
о1хе
о2х1ло
о1й2н.
ой1
о1йск
об1ру
об1ут
о1буж2
обу4ждал
обу3жда
обуж3да1ли
обу4ж3да1ю
обе3з2
о1бе
об3ли
об2л
о1жо
о1ждал
о1ждат
о3ж2де2н.
ож1де
о3ждением
ожде1ни
ождени1е
о3ж4дени4ю
о1ш
о3ше
ош4ли
ош1ка
о2шк
о3за
оз1ро
оз1о1п
о1зо
оз1о1б
о1зу
оз1ве
озв2
оз2ви
оз1л
о1зя
о3зда1на
оздани4е
озда1ни
оз3данием
о3зданиям
оздани1я
оз3дани1и
оз3дани1ю
о3здате1ля
озда1те
о3здатель
оз1дай1
о3зи
о3зы
о1ё
о1э
2н.
1на.
нам2
1на2м.
на1мн
на1в2с2
1на1я
1на1г
1над
1на1с
нас2к
нас4ч
1на1щ
на1ш
на1з
2н1ро
н1ру
н1ре
н1ри
н1ры
1но
но1о1
3ном
но1вр
3ногу
но1г
2но3г2д
нод2
но3д1н
нос1л
но1ск
но1х
но1зн
н1н
н1м
нуж3дал
нужда3я
ну3ждат
ну4ж3да1ю
нуж4дают
н1в
1не
нер2в
не1р1во
не1р1вы
не1р2ж
нем2н
не1вд
не1е2
неес3
не1т1к2
3не2ц
не1дв
несооб3
не1со
несо1о
не1с2т
не1с2ч
не1сп
не1к1т
не1ч1т
не1зн
н1л
1ня
2нян
н1г2
н1та
н1тр
н2тр1а1г
н1то
н1ту
н1тя
н1ти
н1ть
н1ты
2н1ц
нци1к
н1д
н3ду
н3д2ж
2н1с
н2с1н
н2с3м
н2сл
нс2т2
н3ст1к2
н2с1кр
нси1с
н1си
н2сп
нс1по
н1ка
н1ко
н1ку
нк2т
н1кта
н1кто
н1кты
н2к1с
н1ки
1ни
ни1с2т
ни1ск
нис2п
ни1спа
ни1к1т
низо2ш3л
ни1зо
низо1ш
ни1зя
1ню
н1ч
1нье
1нья
нь1я1ми
1ньи
1нью
н1ф2
н1х
н1б
н1ж
2н1ш
н1з
н2з1д
1нё
1ны
2м.
1ма
3ман
ма1ска
м1ру
м1ре
1мо
мо2гл
мо1г
мо1тра
мо1тро
мо1три
3мос
мо1со1
мосоз2
мо1ск
мо1ж2д
м1на
м3ной1
м1но
м1ну
м2не
мнени4я
мне1ни
м1м
м2мн
1му
м1в
2мерт
мева2ю
ме1ва
ме2сл
меж3д
2м1л
м2ль
м2г
мг1ла
2м1с2
3м2стя
мс2т
3м2сти
м1к
1ми
3мин
3мич
м1ч
1мье
2мь1ей1
1мья.
1мья2м.
мь1я1ми
1мьи
1мью
м1ф
м1п
м3пт
м1б
1мё
мэ1
1мы
у1а
у1ра
ура1з
у1ро
у1ру
у1ре
у1ря
у1ри
у1рь
у1ры
у1о1
у1на
у1на2с1
у1ну
ун1к2т
унич1
у1ни
1умр
ум3н
у1ме
3умевает1с2
уме1ва
умева1е
1уме1ю
у1мя
1ум1ц
у1ва
у1во
у1в2н
у1ве
ув1л
у1вя
ув1с2
у1ви
у1е
у1ла
у1ло
у1лу
у1ле
у1ля
у1лы
у1я
уго2с
у1г
у2г3н2
у2г1ли
у1та
у1тр
у1то
у1ту
ут3в2
ут1ва
утвер3ж2де2н.
ут4верж
утверж1де
утвер3ж4де1на
у3те
у1тя
у1ти
у1тю
у1тё
у1ты
у1д
удо1т
у1до
уде2я.
у1де
уде1я
уде2и
3удей1ский1
удейски4
удей1
у2дл
у2дь
удше2е
у2д1ш
уд1ше
ус1н
ус3м
1ус1ма
ус4мо
3усмо1тре2н.
3усмо1тре1на
3усмо1тре1но
3усмо1трен1н
усмот3рени2ю
усмотре1ни
3усмо1тре1ны
у3смот3рет
у1се
у4сер2д1н
ус2ла1
ус1лу
ус1ле
ус1лы
у1с2т
у1ска
у1ско
у1ску
у1с2ке
у1ски
у1сп
у1ка
у1ко
у1ку
ук1в
у1к2л
у1ки
у1и1
у1ю
уч1р
учь1
у1чё
уф1л
у1па
у1пр
3упредить
упре1ди
3упреж1да1е
3упрежде1но
упреж1де
3упреждени1я
упрежде1ни
3упреждени4ю
у1по
у1пу
у1пе
у2п1ли
у1п2л
у1пя
у1пи
ух1в
у1хе
ух1э
у1бр
у1бу
у2бежд
у1бе
убеж4де
у1б2л
у1жо
у1жда.
уж4дае2т.
ужда1е
у4жда1ю
у1ж2ду
у1ж2де.
уж1де
у4ж2де2н.
ужде1ни4
уш3л
у2ш1к
уз1р
уз1н
у1зу
уз1л
у1э
2в.
3ва1я
1ва1г
1ва1ц
ва1с
1ва1и
в1ра.
в1рах
вра1зу
в1ро
в1ри
в1ры
воро1ж2
во1ро
ворна2
вор1н2
ворно2е
вор1но
3ворной1
ворну2
вооб1
во1о
вованна4
во1ва
вован1н
во1вр
вово1й1
во1во
водо1й1
во1до
во2д2н
во3дна
во3дно1г
вод1но
вод3ну2
во3д1ны
во1дв
во1св
во1сл
во2сло
вос1п
во1йт
вой1
во1йд
3вобо1дя
во1б2о
3вобо1ди
3вобо1жу
вобож2
3вобож3дае2т.
вобожда1е
3вобож3дени1и
вобожде1ни4
вобож1де
во1ж2
во2з
воз1н
воз1д
в1на
в1ва
вве3р2гл
ввер1г
4верж
1ве1г
2вечь
ве1жд
в1ля
в2тр
1втрак
1втраш
в1ти
в1ты
вс2
1в2се
в1ск
2вк
в1ка
в1ко
в1ки
вино1в2
ви1но
ви1ск
ви1чь
1виз
1вю1
1вье
1вья
2вь1я2м.
1вью
1в2п
в2х
2в1ш
в3ши
в2з2
взор1в
в1зо
взо2ш
взош1л
1вы
вы1сл
вы3кн
вы1к
выш2
въ2
е1а
е1ра
е1ро
еро1ж
е1ру
ер1ва
ер1ве
е1ре
ере1дв
ере1йт
ерей1
ере1йд
е1ря
е1ри
е1рю
е1рё
е1ры
е1о
е1на
е1ну
емного2
ем1но
емно1г
емноги2
ем3не
е1ме
е1мя
е1у
е1ва
ев1ре
е1во
ево1о1
евооб2
ево2д3н
ево1с4т
ев1н
е1ву
е1ве
ев1л
е1вя
ев1та
ев1с2
е2в1к
е1ви
е2вь1е
е1в2з2
е1е
еес2те1с2т3
еес2т
ее1с1те
е1ла
е1ло
е1лу
е1ле
еле1с2
е1ля
елико3й1
е1ли
ели1ко
е1лю
е1лы
е1я
е2г3н2
е1г
е2г1ли
егко1й1
е2г1к
е1та
ета2я
е1тр
е1то
е1ту
ет1в2
е1тя
ет3ко
ет1к2
е1ти
е1тье.
е1тья
е1тью
е1ты
е2ц
е3ца
е3цо
е3цу
е3це
е3ци
ец1иф
е3цы
е1да
е1др
едово3й1
е1до
едо1во
ед1ва
ед1во
еди1с2
е1ди
е1с1мо
ес2м
есмо3тре
ес3ме
е1св
е1се
ес1ла
е1с2лат
е1слож
е1слу
е1сле
ес1ле.
еследующи4
есле1ду
еследу1ю
еследую1щ
е1ста
ес2т
е1стра
е1стро
е1стре
е1сто
е1сту
е2сть
е3стье
е1ск
ес1пор
ес1под
ес1пок
е1спе
е2с1пер
е1ка
е1ко
ек1н
е1ку
е1кле
ек2л
е2к1ли
ек1ста
е2кс
екс2т
ек1ск
ек1с1п
е1ки
е1и
е1ю
2еч1н
еч1т
еф1р
еф1л
е1п
еп1то
е2пт
еп1ту
е2пь
е1хв
е1хе
е1хэ
е1й1ду
ей1
е1й1дя
е1й1ди
е1бр
е1бу
е1б2л
е2б1ли
е1жо
еж1да1е
е1ждал
е1жда2я
еж1дат
е1жда1ю
еж1дай1
еж2ду.
еж1ду
е1ж2де.
еж1де
е3ж2де2н.
е3ж2де1на
еж4ден1н
еж4дени1е
ежде1ни
е3ждением
е1жье
е1жья
е1шл
еш4ли
еш3т
е2ш1к
езав3т
е1за
езав2
е3з2о1б
е1зо
ез1во
езв2
ез1ло
ез1ле
е1зя
ез1да
е1э1
2л.
лавле1ни4
лав1л
1лав1с2
лаго1й1
ла1г
ла1тье
ла1тья
1лах
ло1о1
1ло1вя
лос1л
ло1ск
ло1сп
ло1бу
л1н
лно1с
л1но
л1м
луж2д
2луш
л1ва
3ле1г
ле2гл
ледовани4е
ле1до
ледо1ва
ледова1ни
ледовани4я.
ледовани1я
лесо1о1
ле1со
л1л
лго1во1
л1г
лго1й1
л1т
л1д2
л3д1н
л1с
л1к2
л2к3л
1ли
3ли.
3лила.
ли1ла
3ли1г
ли1ста
лис2т
ли1с4то
ли1к2л
1льо
1лье
1лья
1льи
1лью
ль1ша4
ль1ш
1льё
л1ф
л1п
лх1в
л1жь
л1ш
1лё
1лы1к
я1ро
ярос1л
я2ро2с2т1н
ярос2т
я1ре
я1ри
я1ры
я1на
яно1с
я1но
я1ну
я1во
яв1л
явля4ю.
яв1ля
явля1ю
я1вя
яв1с2
я2в1к
я1ви
я1е
я1ла
я1ло
я1я
я2г
я3га
я3го
яг3н2
я3гу
я3ги
я1та
я1то
ятос1л
я1ту
ят1во
ятв2
ят1ву
ят1ве
я1ти
я1тье
я1тью
я1ты
я1да
я1др
яс1н
я1се
яс1л
я1ск
я1к
я1и
я1ю
я4ющи2м1с2
яю1щ
я1п
я1бре
я1бря
я1б2л
я1жь
я1зу
я1зя
1г
2г.
га1с
2г1ро1п
гооб1р
го1о
го1вр
го1тв2
го1с
го1ж2
г2н2
4гнуто.
гну1то
г4нев
г1не
2г3ня
г3н1ц
2г3ню
2г1м
2гв
г3ви1
2г1ла.
2г1ло.
3г2лис
г1ли
2г1т
г3то
2гд
г1да
3г2де
2г1с
2г1к
ги1с
ги2б2л
2г1ч
2г1б
2г1ш
2т.
та2е1мо2
та1е
та1тье
та1тья
та1с
та1и
3таю1щ
та1ю
тающе2е
3таз
2т2р.
т1ра2з1
т1род
3труб
1тре2н.
1тре1на
1тре1но
1трен1н
трени2ю
тре1ни
1тре1ны
3треть1с2
тре3к
3треб
т1реж
т1реш
1тря.
1трят
т1ряд
1трим
1триш
1трю
2трь
то1рв
1толко
тол1к2
то1тр
тотран3
тос1ло
то1ск
то1сп
1токам
то1ка
1токов
то1ко
1току.
то1ку
3точ1н
3то1щ
3то2п1т
то1п
3то2пч
то1б
2тобрав
2тобрал
2тобрат
1то1жа
1то1жу
1то1жи
2тош4ли
то1ш
то1з
2т1н
т3ной1
т1но
3т2нё
т1м
1ту1а
тв2
т1вр
4т3ворной1
твор1н2
твор1но
т1вод
т1вл
т1вя
т2вь
1те
3те1ря
3терз
3те2ц
те1с2т
тествен1но4
те1ств2
тествен1н
2теч
т1л
2т1т
т1д
т1с2
т1со1
т2с2м
т1к2
т2кан
т2кос
1тин1н
1ти1не
тив1л
ти2гл
ти1г
ти1ста
тис2т
ти1кв
ти1хр
т1ч
т2щ
ть2м
ть1ем
ть1е1г
1тьей1
1тьи
т1ф
т1п
т1х
т1б
т1ж
т1ш2
т1з
1ц
2ц.
3цать
це1т2
2ц1ц
ц1с
2ц1к
ци1кло
цик2л
цю1
2ц1ш
2д.
1да2н.
1данна
дан1н
1дан1ны
1да1ны
дав2л
да1в1ля
3дателем
да1те
дате1ле
3дателей1
3дате1ли
дающа2
да1ю
даю1щ
1да1ё
2д2р.
д1рас3
1дро.
д1роб
д1рек
1дрял
д1ряд
1дри
1до
до1м2н
3до1г
до1тр
до1с
до2сл
дос4т
допо1й1
до1п
до1хр
до1х2не
дох1н
до1бр
до1б2л
до1жда
до3шк
до1ш
до1з
2д1н
3д2нел
д1не
4дней1
д3нит
д1ни
д1м
д1мо1
дме3с
1ду
ду1н
2дус
ду3смотре1ни
дус3м
дус4мо
4дупред
ду1пр
2дупреж
3дупре1жда1ю
3дупре3ж2де2н.
дупреж1де
д1во3д
д1ве
д1вл
д3вк
д1ви1д
1де
3де1ны
де1мь
де2е.
де1е
де1с2т
де1к2л
де2ю.
де1ю
дейски4
дей1
3деж2д.
де1жда
де1ж1ду
1де1ж1де
3деж1ды
д1ла
д1ло
д1ле
д1ля
1дли2т.
д1ли
1длить
1дя
2д1т
дтверж3де
дтв2
дт4верж
д3те
2д1ц
д3ца.
2д1д2
2д1с
д1со1
3д2с2м
2д1к
1ди
ди1во1
див1л
ди2с1к
д1ч
3дье.
3дье1ю
дь1ей1
3дья
3дьи
3дью
д1п
д1х
2д1б
2дж
2д1ш
д1з
1дё
1ды
2с.
1са
сажде1ни4
саж1де
1ср
сра1з
1со
со1рв
сор2т
со1р1та
со1р1то
со1мн
со1вр
со1в2л
со1тр
со1тв2
со1д
со1с2
соко1й1
со1ко
со1х
со2х1н
со1бр
со1б2л
со1зр
со1зв2
соз3дания.
созда1ни
создани1я
со3здава3ли.
соз1дав
соз4дава1ли
созда1ва
со3зда2л.
со2здал
со3зда1ли
со3здать
с2но1ю
с1но
с1ну
с2м
3смотрет
с1мо
2с1ми
1су
3су4ж2де2н.
